Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1863
Real property taxes and special assessments; extinguished after fifteen years; not required to be certified.

Any county officer or other person who is required to certify to public records shall not be required to certify to any taxes or special assessments, penalty and costs, which have been released and extinguished in accordance with the provisions of section 77-1861 and 77-1862.

Laws 1959, c. 354, § 3, p. 1249.